Tennessee, session 114, HB2156.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. The department of revenue shall study the potential economic impact of
making all excise tax credits transferable to any person or entity, other than the person or entity
to whom or to which the credits are initially made. On or before December 15, 2026, the
department shall report its findings and recommendations to the finance, ways and means
committee of the senate and the committee in the house of representatives having jurisdiction
over tax-related matters.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2156
012094
- 1 -